dict/el_CY.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4075 Y 1
SFX 4075 0 αφερόντουσαν .
SFX 2059 Y 1
SFX 2059 0 ειλημμένος .
SFX 2058 Y 1
SFX 2058 0 ειλημμένου .
SFX 2060 Y 1
SFX 2060 0 ειλημμένοι .
SFX 4734 Y 1
SFX 4734 0 ασκευαστώ .
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 0 θυμα .
SFX 1967 Y 1
SFX 1967 0 θυμε .
SFX 1966 Y 1
SFX 1966 0 θυμη .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 θυμο .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 έγραφαν .
SFX 3018 Y 1
SFX 3018 0 εργασίας .
SFX 2369 Y 1
SFX 2369 0 νίζατε .
SFX 4642 Y 1
SFX 4642 0 νιάζοντας .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 έγραφες .
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 0 εργαζόσαστε .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 δρομους .
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 0 οικισμένες .
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 0 βουλων .
SFX 4338 Y 1
SFX 4338 0 οικισμένης .
SFX 4918 Y 1
SFX 4918 0 τεθήκαμε .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 ξατε .
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 0 τεθήκανε .
SFX 3805 Y 1
SFX 3805 0 έβηκε .
SFX 4336 Y 1
SFX 4336 0 οικισμένος .
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 0 οικισμένου .
SFX 4337 Y 1
SFX 4337 0 οικισμένοι .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 καρισμένων .
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 0 ητικός .
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 0 λιάζοντας .
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 0 βουλες .
SFX 4648 Y 1
SFX 4648 0 λιάζονται .
SFX 4647 Y 1
SFX 4647 0 λιάζονταν .
SFX 2401 Y 1
SFX 2401 0 ητικές .
SFX 2396 Y 1
SFX 2396 0 ητικών .
SFX 2400 Y 1
SFX 2400 0 ητικής .
SFX 2412 Y 1
SFX 2412 0 βουλης .
SFX 2370 Y 1
SFX 2370 0 νίζαμε .
SFX 4571 Y 1
SFX 4571 0 στώνοντας .
SFX 2582 Y 1
SFX 2582 0 τρων .
SFX 2410 Y 1
SFX 2410 0 βουλος .
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 0 βουλου .
SFX 2411 Y 1
SFX 2411 0 βουλοι .
SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 0 καρισμένες .
SFX 1944 Y 1
SFX 1944 0 συρε .
SFX 818 Y 1
SFX 818 0 γων .
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 0 οικίσω .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 καρισμένης .
SFX 3804 Y 1
SFX 3804 0 έλκει .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 ραγμένους .
SFX 4691 Y 1
SFX 4691 0 εισάγεστε .
SFX 1929 Y 1
SFX 1929 0 τρών .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 0 ξαμε .
SFX 4273 Y 1
SFX 4273 0 τρωνόσαστε .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 ξανε .
SFX 2398 Y 1
SFX 2398 0 ητικού .
SFX 2399 Y 1
SFX 2399 0 ητικοί .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 καρισμένος .
SFX 1614 Y 1
SFX 1614 0 καρισμένου .
SFX 1616 Y 1
SFX 1616 0 καρισμένοι .
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 0 γαν .
SFX 2813 Y 1
SFX 2813 0 τιθέμενων .
SFX 4031 Y 1
SFX 4031 0 ευρισκόμασταν .
SFX 3796 Y 1
SFX 3796 0 έστην .
SFX 4932 Y 1
SFX 4932 0 σματικός .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 εργαζόμασταν .
SFX 4936 Y 1
SFX 4936 0 σματικές .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 στροφων .
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 0 σματικών .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 γες .
SFX 2010 Y 1
SFX 2010 0 γει .
SFX 4935 Y 1
SFX 4935 0 σματικής .
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 0 τριά .
SFX 1931 Y 1
SFX 1931 0 τρια .
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 0 τυπωνόμαστε .
SFX 3394 Y 1
SFX 3394 0 νιστεί .
SFX 4692 Y 1
SFX 4692 0 εισάγεσαι .
SFX 4742 Y 1
SFX 4742 0 αριθμείτε .
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 0 γιά .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 έλειψαν .
SFX 2243 Y 1
SFX 2243 0 οικήστε .
SFX 1320 Y 1
SFX 1320 0 ρίζομαι .
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 0 γμα .
SFX 1930 Y 1
SFX 1930 0 τρου .
SFX 3384 Y 1
SFX 3384 0 οικίζω .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 έλειψες .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 0 τιθέμενες .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 γος .
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 0 γου .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 γοι .
SFX 3087 Y 1
SFX 3087 0 ωθείται .
SFX 3220 Y 1
SFX 3220 0 ιάστηκα .
SFX 3219 Y 1
SFX 3219 0 ιάστηκε .
SFX 2816 Y 1
SFX 2816 0 τιθέμενης .
SFX 853 Y 1
SFX 853 0 στροφες .
SFX 4884 Y 1
SFX 4884 0 τόσασταν .
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 0 στροφης .
SFX 4933 Y 1
SFX 4933 0 σματικού .
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 0 σματικοί .
SFX 3084 Y 1
SFX 3084 0 άγγειλαν .
SFX 4650 Y 1
SFX 4650 0 κισμένους .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 τιθέμενος .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 0 ελκυόμαστε .
SFX 4551 Y 1
SFX 4551 0 τιθέμενου .
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 0 τιθέμενοι .
SFX 3944 Y 1
SFX 3944 0 έρθω .
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 0 στροφος .
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 0 στροφου .
SFX 852 Y 1
SFX 852 0 στροφοι .
SFX 2404 Y 1
SFX 2404 0 ελήφθη .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 έρια .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 τρικός .
SFX 2244 Y 1
SFX 2244 0 οικήσει .
SFX 4203 Y 1
SFX 4203 0 ασκευαστούν .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 ζουσα .
SFX 1418 Y 1
SFX 1418 0 θήκατε .
SFX 1730 Y 1
SFX 1730 0 τρικές .
SFX 1381 Y 1
SFX 1381 0 τρικών .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 0 τρικής .
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 0 αρίσματα .
SFX 4358 Y 1
SFX 4358 0 ευρεθήκατε .
SFX 682 Y 1
SFX 682 0 άγατε .
SFX 4805 Y 1
SFX 4805 0 αιρέσουμε .
SFX 4639 Y 1
SFX 4639 0 νιζόντανε .
SFX 4868 Y 1
SFX 4868 0 ωθούμενα .
SFX 4867 Y 1
SFX 4867 0 ωθούμενε .
SFX 4866 Y 1
SFX 4866 0 ωθούμενη .
SFX 4865 Y 1
SFX 4865 0 ωθούμενο .
SFX 2992 Y 1
SFX 2992 0 λίζοντας .
SFX 4234 Y 1
SFX 4234 0 αλειφτήκατε .
SFX 2528 Y 1
SFX 2528 0 ητικό .
SFX 2531 Y 1
SFX 2531 0 ητικά .
SFX 2530 Y 1
SFX 2530 0 ητικέ .
SFX 2529 Y 1
SFX 2529 0 ητική .
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 0 οικισμός .
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 0 λιάζουμε .
SFX 4671 Y 1
SFX 4671 0 ελκύοντας .
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 0 τρικού .
SFX 1728 Y 1
SFX 1728 0 τρικοί .
SFX 4673 Y 1
SFX 4673 0 ελκύονται .
SFX 4672 Y 1
SFX 4672 0 ελκύονταν .
SFX 4985 Y 1
SFX 4985 0 οικισμών .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 ήσουν .
SFX 1920 Y 1
SFX 1920 0 άγαγε .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 θήκαμε .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 ζουμε .
SFX 1419 Y 1
SFX 1419 0 θήκανε .
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 0 ζουνε .
SFX 4359 Y 1
SFX 4359 0 ευρεθήκαμε .
SFX 683 Y 1
SFX 683 0 άγαμε .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 άγανε .
SFX 4356 Y 1
SFX 4356 0 ινόντουσαν .
SFX 3306 Y 1
SFX 3306 0 όμετρα .
SFX 3305 Y 1
SFX 3305 0 όμετρο .
SFX 4987 Y 1
SFX 4987 0 οικισμού .
SFX 4988 Y 1
SFX 4988 0 οικισμοί .
SFX 2971 Y 1
SFX 2971 0 νισμένων .
SFX 3251 Y 1
SFX 3251 0 γγελλαν .
SFX 4235 Y 1
SFX 4235 0 αλειφτήκαμε .
SFX 4808 Y 1
SFX 4808 0 αθετόσουν .
SFX 3250 Y 1
SFX 3250 0 γγελλες .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 ίζεστε .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 έστρεφαν .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 άρω .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 ύρα .
SFX 4007 Y 1
SFX 4007 0 άρα .
SFX 3957 Y 1
SFX 3957 0 ύρε .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 άρι .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 ύρο .
SFX 3659 Y 1
SFX 3659 0 νευσε .
SFX 3955 Y 1
SFX 3955 0 ύσω .
SFX 4006 Y 1
SFX 4006 0 άσω .
SFX 3072 Y 1
SFX 3072 0 έστρεφες .
SFX 1245 Y 1
SFX 1245 0 άτα .
SFX 820 Y 1
SFX 820 0 άτε .
SFX 2013 Y 1
SFX 2013 0 άτη .
SFX 2698 Y 1
SFX 2698 0 άτο .
SFX 4125 Y 1
SFX 4125 0 αθετόντουσαν .
SFX 2976 Y 1
SFX 2976 0 νισμένες .
SFX 3695 Y 1
SFX 3695 0 ληψής .
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 0 νισμένης .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 ρ .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 ς .
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 τ .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 υ .
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 0 φ .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 ω .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 ό .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 ύ .
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 0 ά .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 ώ .
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 0 έ .
SFX 581 Y 1
SFX 581 0 ή .
SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 0 ί .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 α .
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 0 ε .
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 0 ζ .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 η .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 ι .
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 κ .
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 0 λ .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 μ .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 ν .
SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 0 ξ .
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 0 ο .
SFX 1378 Y 1
SFX 1378 0 τροπων .
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 φυλλα .
SFX 767 Y 1
SFX 767 0 φυλλε .
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 0 φυλλη .
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 0 φυλλο .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 ίζεσαι .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 νισμένος .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 νισμένου .
SFX 2974 Y 1
SFX 2974 0 νισμένοι .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 ληψης .
SFX 3900 Y 1
SFX 3900 0 ικων .
SFX 3552 Y 1
SFX 3552 0 έδειξα .
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 0 έδειξε .
SFX 2374 Y 1
SFX 2374 0 λήσετε .
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 0 ληψις .
SFX 3289 Y 1
SFX 3289 0 έδειξαν .
SFX 3661 Y 1
SFX 3661 0 νευαν .
SFX 1388 Y 1
SFX 1388 0 στούμε .
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 0 ικός .
SFX 4042 Y 1
SFX 4042 0 ασκευαζόμαστε .
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 0 στούνε .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 ικές .
SFX 1246 Y 1
SFX 1246 0 άγω .
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 ικών .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 0 λίσατε .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 ικής .
SFX 1605 Y 1
SFX 1605 0 άδα .
SFX 3288 Y 1
SFX 3288 0 έδειξες .
SFX 3660 Y 1
SFX 3660 0 νευες .
SFX 2701 Y 1
SFX 2701 0 άει .
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 νουσα .
SFX 1380 Y 1
SFX 1380 0 τροπες .
SFX 4822 Y 1
SFX 4822 0 αδεχόσουν .
SFX 2725 Y 1
SFX 2725 0 αχωνόντουσαν .
SFX 1379 Y 1
SFX 1379 0 τροπης .
SFX 2598 Y 1
SFX 2598 0 ρτών .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 άκι .
SFX 3904 Y 1
SFX 3904 0 ικες .
SFX 4619 Y 1
SFX 4619 0 οικιστούν .
SFX 2700 Y 1
SFX 2700 0 άμε .
SFX 3903 Y 1
SFX 3903 0 ικης .
SFX 4008 Y 1
SFX 4008 0 άνα .
