dict/el_CY.dic
Μάρω/2
πάκο/4
έσωζε/1
όγδοε/1
φανού/1,2
κρότο/1,2,3,4
μίσχο/1,3,4
μόσκο/1,3,4
βουνό/2
χωρίο/2,4
αγκάλη/1
λαγάνα/1
τύλιξη/1
δάνειο/1,2,3,4
ωοτόκο/1,2,3,4
πίθηκο/1,3
έρρινο/1,3,4
ανήλιο/1,3,4
σκάρτο/1,3,4
τσίγκο/1,3,4
έστεφα/2
δείξου/2
κύμανα/2
πιάνου/2
φύρησα/2
γονάτο/4
Πλάτωνα/1
βακίλου/1
θεομάχε/1
ξέραινε/1
συγχέει/1
διάνοια/1,2
στάσιμο/1,2,3,4
υπέρηχο/1,3
άκλωστο/1,3,4
άχραντο/1,3,4
αντήλιο/1,3,4
γάργαρο/1,3,4
ερωμένο/1,3,4
κρηναίο/1,3,4
οξύτατο/1,3,4
σύλλαβο/1,3,4
ανέθεσα/2
γάβγισα/2
εισχωρώ/2
θαύμαζα/2
λαΐκιζα/2
ξέφραξα/2
πούμωσα/2
στόρισα/2
λείψανο/2,4
πρωτείο/2,4
αεροδίνη/1
αχρέωτου/1
εννοήσει/1
κελευτεί/1
ξεΐδρωσε/1
πρόγευση/1
τρώγουσα/1
ιαίνοντα/1,2,3
Λαρισαίο/1,3,4
αγύρευτο/1,3,4
αισώπειο/1,3,4
ανόργανο/1,3,4
απότιστο/1,3,4
δασύτατο/1,3,4
εγχυμένο/1,3,4
ισόμετρο/1,3,4
κενότατο/1,3,4
νεανίσκο/1,3,4
ξυλόσοφο/1,3,4
πνιγμένο/1,3,4
πτοημένο/1,3,4
υπέρβαρο/1,3,4
φιλότιμο/1,3,4
ανάκυπτα/2
γλυφάνου/2
εορτάσου/2
κροτούσα/2
ορμήθηκα/2
σκοτίσου/2
φθείρισα/2
εξώφυλλο/2,4
αβγάταινε/1
αποκλίνει/1
δεξιωμένε/1
εργένικου/1
κεραμωτού/1
μπιστικού/1
παραμυθία/1
σερραίικη/1
υγραντικό/1
περιοδικό/1,2
μαραθώνιο/1,2,3,4
Δεκέμβριο/1,3
αλίκνιστο/1,3,4
ανάρμοστο/1,3,4
ασπέδιστο/1,3,4
ατσαλένιο/1,3,4
διαλυμένο/1,3,4
εγχεόμενο/1,3,4
θυμισμένο/1,3,4
καινότερο/1,3,4
λατρεμένο/1,3,4
μαγκεμένο/1,3,4
ξυλισμένο/1,3,4
ομόγλωσσο/1,3,4
πολύμορφο/1,3,4
προτεραίο/1,3,4
τεχνολόγο/1,3,4
τρυπωμένο/1,3,4
ψωριάρικο/1,3,4
Φιλάδελφο/1,4
απαρτίζου/2
διαρθρώνω/2
επιμήκυνα/2
κερατώσου/2
ξαναέβαψα/2
περιέπεσα/2
στάχτιασα/2
υπολείπου/2
σκαντάλιο/4
ανατράπηκε/1
αφούρνιστε/1
δωριζόμενε/1
ζουλιγμένη/1
κορακοειδή/1
νεκροτομία/1
παραφράζει/1
ρουμπινιού/1
τηλεγραφεί/1
χρυσαλοιφή/1
καρυκευτού/1,2
παπαρολόγο/1,3
αμαντάλωτο/1,3,4
αναδασωτέο/1,3,4
αποψυγμένο/1,3,4
ασατίριστο/1,3,4
γανιασμένο/1,3,4
γουστόζικο/1,3,4
εξαιρέσιμο/1,3,4
επιπλωμένο/1,3,4
κανακεμένο/1,3,4
κεντρόφυγο/1,3,4
λιπαρότερο/1,3,4
μετεθεμένο/1,3,4
μουγγαμένο/1,3,4
οπισθόδομο/1,3,4
παλιόκοσμο/1,3,4
ραβδισμένο/1,3,4
σημαδεμένο/1,3,4
τετραψήφιο/1,3,4
τροπαιούχο/1,3,4
χωρατεμένο/1,3,4
αντιλάλησα/2
διασαλπίζω/2
επιπλήττου/2
κεραυνώσου/2
ξανασήκωσα/2
περιβρέχου/2
σπαταλήσου/2
υπομονέψου/2
αναδυόμενα/3
θεοσκόταδο/4
αμαρκάριστε/1
αποτιμητικό/1
διαμαντένια/1
επιβαίνουσα/1
κατανοούντο/1
μνηστευμένε/1
παραγναθίδα/1
πρωταρχίσει/1
ταχυγραφική/1
χοντρόμυαλη/1
παρεξετράπη/1,2
σημειούμενο/1,3
ακατανίκητο/1,3,4
ανεκδίκαστο/1,3,4
απαράγραπτο/1,3,4
αρχινισμένο/1,3,4
αχρωμάτιστο/1,3,4
δευτερότοκο/1,3,4
εγκολλημένο/1,3,4
εξοργισμένο/1,3,4
ευπαθέστερο/1,3,4
καλυπτόμενο/1,3,4
κορωπιώτικο/1,3,4
κυκλικότατο/1,3,4
μαυρομάνικο/1,3,4
νοικιασμένο/1,3,4
οροθετημένο/1,3,4
πλακόστρωτο/1,3,4
σατιρογράφο/1,3,4
στρατευμένο/1,3,4
τρισβάρβαρο/1,3,4
φατριασμένο/1,3,4
αποναρκώσου/2
εκφυλίστηκα/2
καταλήστεψα/2
ξαγναντευτώ/2
περιέφρασσα/2
στρατούλιζα/2
φωτογράφιζα/2
αθροιζόμενα/3
ασβεστόνερο/4
ανανούριστου/1
αυτοθαυμασμό/1
εκπλησσόμενε/1
κακογεννήσει/1
μεταμορφώνει/1
παρακινημένε/1
τυραννημένου/1
αβαντζάροντα/1,3
ακατονόμαστο/1,3,4
ανεκτικότερο/1,3,4
αποθερισμένο/1,3,4
ασυνταύτιστο/1,3,4
δερματέμπορο/1,3,4
δυσφημούμενο/1,3,4
εξογκωνόμενο/1,3,4
ευτρεπισμένο/1,3,4
κρεουργημένο/1,3,4
μεταξοΰφαντο/1,3,4
ξανασμιγμένο/1,3,4
πρωτοσύγκελο/1,3,4
στρεπτόκοκκο/1,3,4
ψυχομαχημένο/1,3,4
αναδημοσίευα/2
διατρυπήθηκα/2
κατατεμάχιζα/2
ομογνωμόνησα/2
σμπαραλιάσου/2
χλιμιντρούσα/2
ειρηνοδικείο/2,4
εξολοθρευτικό/1
παραμυθολόγου/1
αποτριχώνοντα/1,2,3
δημοδιδάσκαλο/1,3
αστρατολόγητο/1,3,4
διαπρεπέστατο/1,3,4
καταφορτωμένο/1,3,4
μετακαλεσμένο/1,3,4
προσηλιασμένο/1,3,4
συγγεγραμμένο/1,3,4
αποστρατεύσου/2
λεξικογράφησα/2
σακουλιάστηκα/2
μπομποτάλευρο/4
εικοσιτετράωρε/1
σκαφιδιαζόμενη/1
διασταυρώνοντα/1,2,3
κηδεμονευόμενο/1,3
επιπωματισμένο/1,3,4
ηγουμενευόμενο/1,3,4
ρετουσαρισμένο/1,3,4
σπουδαρχούμενο/1,3,4
μετριοφρονήσου/2
δανειοδοτούμενη/1
αποσκορακισμένο/1,3,4
διασκορπιζόμενο/1,3,4
μετεξελισσόμενο/1,3,4
τοιχογυριζόμενο/1,3,4
αισθητοποιήθηκα/2
ραδιογωνιόμετρο/2,4
προχειρογραμμένο/1,3,4
αλληλοϋποστήριξα/2
καταδυναστευμένου/1
βαρυστομαχιασμένο/1,3,4
μεταστρατοπεδευμένο/1,3,4
